Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2921
Livestock, defined.

Livestock means cattle, swine, sheep, horses, mules, donkeys, goats, domesticated cervine animals, ratite birds, poultry, llamas, and alpacas.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 21.